California, session 20252026, AB1106.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 39950) is added to Part 2 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 9. Regional Air Quality Incident Response Program39950. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Air contaminant” includes any toxic air contaminant designated or identified pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 39650), and as defined in Section 39013, and any substance as listed in the Table of Standards pursuant to Section 70200 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.(b) “Air quality incident response center” means an air quality incident response center established pursuant to this chapter to facilitate emergency air monitoring.39951. Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of this chapter, the state board shall expand its incident air monitoring program to provide support in accordance with this chapter for a regional network of air quality incident response centers operated by districts in order to facilitate emergency air monitoring response at the local and regional level.39952. (a) The state board shall, in coordination with districts, establish air quality incident response centers throughout the state, including at least one air quality incident response center located within the jurisdiction of the south coast district, all of which shall receive support pursuant to this chapter. Prior to the state board establishing an air quality incident response center within a district, the state board shall coordinate and develop operational plans for the air quality incident response centers with the relevant districts. The state board and each district shall only be responsible to operate an air quality incident response center and perform the other duties set forth in this chapter to the extent that the state board provides funding for those purposes.(b) The state board and each district that operates an air quality incident response center shall coordinate to provide emergency air monitoring response for disasters or other crises impacting air quality and public health in the state, as determined by the state board and those districts.39953. (a) Funding made available to the state board for purposes of this chapter may be used, but is not limited to being used, for any of the following purposes:(1) Program funding to plan, create, equip, and maintain air quality incident response centers, including for the acquisition of monitoring equipment and systems, vehicles, and other necessary equipment, and facilities, needed to support air quality incident response centers, and to plan, develop, conduct training on, and implement incident response protocols.(2) Air quality data collection, maintenance, analysis, presentation, dissemination, modeling, and publishing, and the integration of that data into a unified command or joint information center, and other related activities.(3) The funding of staffing resources, including a State Air Quality Health Officer, and regional emergency response coordinators and technical staff at districts that operate air quality incident response centers, develop plans, prepare for, and respond during, incidents and as needed for investigation and recovery efforts.(4) Training and preparedness exercises for state board staff and the staff of districts that operate air quality incident response centers to facilitate expeditious, efficient, and effective emergency air monitoring responses to provide air quality information to the public and protect public health.(5) State board-supported research studies regarding any of the following:(A) The health impacts of emissions from wildfires and other types of air quality incidents, in coordination with districts.(B) Health risk communication research and emissions, including speciation.(C) Updates to source profiles and emissions inventories.(b) In undertaking their duties funded pursuant to subdivision (a), the State Air Quality Health Officer shall support local response by doing both of the following:(1) Providing expertise to translate air monitoring data collection, analyses, and modeling results in terms of impacts on public health.(2) Coordinating with relevant state and local agencies, local governments, and public health departments, including districts, to provide unified command and joint information centers, and with other organizations with air quality data and analysis to inform the public and local response and recovery efforts.39954. As part of the operation of an air quality incident response center, air quality monitoring shall be conducted for targeted air contaminants of concern, as identified by the state board or the district operating that air quality incident response center, during disaster or emergency situations and during the recovery period from a disaster or emergency to aid impacted communities, and shall be conducted, as needed, in coordination with unified command centers, joint information centers, other state agencies, and other entities, as appropriate.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 39602.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:39602.5.(a)The state board shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to Section 43013 that, in conjunction with other measures adopted by the state board, the districts, and the United States Environmental Protection Agency, will achieve the ambient air quality standards required by the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7401 et seq.) in all areas of the state by the applicable attainment date, and to maintain these standards thereafter. The state board shall adopt these measures if they are necessary, technologically feasible, and cost effective, consistent with Section 43013.(b)If necessary to carry out its duties under this section, the state board shall adopt and enforce rules and regulations that anticipate the development of new technologies or the improvement of existing technologies. The rules and regulations shall require standards that the state board finds and determines can likely be achieved by the compliance date set forth in the rule.